Hawaii statutes.
§328-12 Suspension and reinstatement of
permits. The department of health may suspend immediately upon notice any
permit issued under authority of section 328-11 if it is found that any of the
conditions of the permit have been violated. The holder of a permit so
suspended shall be privileged at any time to apply for the reinstatement of the
permit, and the department shall, immediately after prompt hearing and an
inspection of the establishment, reinstate the permit if it is found that
adequate measures have been taken to comply with and maintain the conditions of
the permit, as originally issued, or as amended.

Any officer or employee duly designated by the
director of health shall have access to any factory or establishment, the
operator of which holds a permit from the department, for the purpose of
ascertaining whether or not the conditions of the permit are being complied
with, and denial of access for such inspection shall be grounds for suspension
of the permit until such access is freely given by the operator. [L 1941, c
318, pt of §8; RL 1945, §2212; RL 1955, §51-12; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §19; HRS
§328-12]

Cross References

Other food safety issues, see §§321-4.5, 4.6, 11.51, and
27.5.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next